dictsource/be_rules
// This file is UTF8 encoded
// Translation rules for Belarusian

.group а
       а       a

.group б
       б       b

.group в
       в       v

.group г
       г       Q     // ɣ

.group д
       д       d

.group е
       е       ;E    // ʲɛ

.group ё
       ё       ;O    // ʲɔ

.group ж
       ж       z.    // ʐ

.group з
       з       z

.group і
       і       i

.group й
       й       j

.group к
       к       k

.group л
       л       l

.group м
       м       m

.group н
       н       n

.group о
       о       o

.group п
       п       p

.group р
       р       r

.group с
       с       s

.group т
       т       t

.group у
       у       u

.group ў
       ў       w

.group ф
       ф       f

.group х
       х       x

.group ц
       ц       ts    // ts

.group ч
       ч       ts.   // ts.

.group ш
       ш       s.    // s.

.group ы
       ы       i"    // (ɨ

.group ь
       ь       ;     // ʲ

.group э
       э       E     // ɛ

.group ю
       ю       ;u    // ʲu

.group я
       я       ;a    // ʲa

.group '
       '       j
